Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1016
Cosmetology, defined.

Cosmetology means the practice of performing for compensation any or all (1) of the acts of arranging, dressing, curling, waving, cleansing, cutting, bleaching, coloring, styling, or similar work upon the hair, wig, wiglet, or hairpiece of any person, by any means, with hands or a mechanical or electrical apparatus or appliance; (2) esthetics; (3) nail technology; and (4) other similar practices upon the hair, scalp, face, neck, arms, hands, feet, or nails of any person when performed for the purpose of beautifying or enhancing physical appearance or the teaching of any practice specified in this section for occupational purposes.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 12;

Laws 1987, LB 543, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 6;

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 6;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-351;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 278.